Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-9003
Legislative findings and declaration.

The Legislature
finds and declares that the own risk and solvency assessment summary report
will contain confidential and sensitive information related to an insurer's
or insurance group's identification of risks that is material and relevant
to the insurer or insurance group filing the report. The information will
include proprietary and trade secret information that has the potential for
harm and competitive disadvantage to the insurer or insurance group if the
information is made public. It is the intent of the Legislature that the own
risk and solvency assessment summary report shall be a confidential document
filed with the director, that the own risk and solvency assessment summary
report shall be shared only as provided in the Risk Management and Own Risk
and Solvency Assessment Act and to assist the director in the performance
of his or her duties, and that in no event shall the own risk and solvency
assessment summary report be subject to public disclosure.

Laws 2014, LB700, § 3.